Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 5
MOTORCYCLE OPERATOR SAFETY TRAINING

Editor's note:

This part 5 was added with relocations in 1994, effective January 1, 1995, containing relocated provisions of some sections formerly located in article 4 of title 42. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For the short title of this part 5 ("Uniform Safety Code of 1935"), see § 42-4-101.

43-5-501. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the motorcycle operator safety advisory board created in section 43-5-505.

(1.5) "Chief" means the chief of the state patrol, created in section 24-33.5-201.

"Fund" means the motorcycle operator safety training fund created in section 43-5-504.

"Instructor training specialist" means a licensed motorcycle operator who meets the standards promulgated by the office to train and oversee instructors for the program.

(3.5) "MOST" or "program" means the motorcycle operator safety training program created by this part 5.

(3.6) "MOST vendor" means a person that offers a motorcycle operator safety training program that meets standards promulgated by the department of transportation.

"Office" means the office of the chief of the state patrol in the department of public safety.

Repealed.

"Program coordinator" means a person designated by the chief to ensure compliance with program rules, program operation, and motorcycle safety coordination.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 2539, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (1.5), (3.5), (3.6), and (6) added, and (5) repealed, (HB 13-1083), ch. 86, p. 273, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(1.5), (4), and (6) amended, (SB 17-243), ch. 256, p. 1071, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1701 as it existed prior to 1994.

43-5-502. Motorcycle operator safety training program - rules.

The office shall establish a motorcycle operator safety training program that promotes motorcycle safety awareness and supports courses to teach students to safely operate a motorcycle and train instructors. To be eligible under the program, a course must include instruction on the effects of alcohol and drugs on the operation of motorcycles. The office shall set standards for the certification of courses in the program, ensure that program training follows these standards, and ensure that courses are offered safely, consistent with best practices. The office shall contract with MOST vendors for the purpose of providing the program.
(1) (a) (I) The office shall establish a motorcycle operator safety training program that promotes motorcycle safety awareness and supports courses to teach students to safely operate a motorcycle and train instructors. To be eligible under the program, a course must include instruction on the effects of alcohol and drugs on the operation of motorcycles. The office shall set standards for the certification of courses in the program, ensure that program training follows these standards, and ensure that courses are offered safely, consistent with best practices. The office shall contract with MOST vendors for the purpose of providing the program.

The following individuals may enroll in a certified motorcycle operator safety training course:

A resident of the state who holds a valid Colorado driver's license, minor driver's license, or instruction permit authorized by section 42-2-106, C.R.S.;

A member of the armed forces who has moved to Colorado on a permanent change-of-station basis and who holds a valid driver's license issued by another state; and

An adult who holds a valid driver's license from another state and who is eligible for a motorcycle license in the same state.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

(I.5) To qualify under the program, a basic training course provided by a MOST vendor must teach the requirements for issuing a driver's license motorcycle endorsement.

The office shall promulgate rules establishing standards for MOST vendors to provide training services. The office shall promulgate rules establishing a system to record program performance data, including information on motorcycle accidents, injuries, and fatalities among persons who have completed the program.

The chief shall designate a program coordinator to implement and administer the program. The program coordinator may certify instructor training specialists who meet the applicable standards. The department of public safety shall establish standards for recertification training and monitoring of MOST instructors.

The office shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the program pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The office shall not expend more than fifteen percent of the total cost of the program for administrative costs.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 2540, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1)(a)(II) amended, p. 1360, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(II) amended and (1)(a)(III) added, p. 855, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1083), ch. 86, p. 274, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 17-243), ch. 256, p. 1071, § 2, effective January 1, 2018.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1702 as it existed prior to 1994.

43-5-502.5. Transfer of functions - transitional provisions - repeal.

The chief and the office of the chief, respectively, shall, on and after January 1, 2018, execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested prior to January 1, 2018, in the director and the office of transportation safety within the department of transportation concerning the program.

All rules and orders of the department of transportation or the director of the office of transportation safety adopted prior to January 1, 2018, in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the chief, continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law. On and after January 1, 2018, the chief or the office of the chief, whichever is appropriate, shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of the program.

No suit, action, or other judicial or administrative proceeding lawfully commenced before January 1, 2018, or that could have been commenced before that date, by or against the department of transportation or the director of the office of transportation safety abates by reason of the transfer of duties and functions from them to the chief.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-243), ch. 256, p. 1072, § 3, effective January 1, 2018.

43-5-503. MOST instructor requirements and training.

The office shall establish standards for an approved MOST instructor training course. To successfully complete the course, a student must demonstrate knowledge of course material, knowledge of safe motorcycle operating practices, and the necessary aptitude for instructing students.

To be eligible, each applicant for an instructor certificate must:

Be at least twenty-one years of age; and

Hold a valid driver's license that:

Authorizes the holder to drive a motorcycle; and

Has not been revoked within or suspended within the three years before the date the application is filed.

No applicant shall be certified as a MOST instructor if, within the three years before the date the application is filed:

The applicant was convicted for an offense that is assigned eight or more points in the schedule, as specified in section 42-2-127 (5), C.R.S., or its equivalent in another state; or

The applicant's driver's license from any other state was revoked or suspended.

The office shall prescribe the form for an approved MOST instructor certificate and shall provide for verification that a certified MOST instructor is currently active in the program. To be eligible for the program, a MOST instructor must have a current certificate.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 2540, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1083), ch. 86, p. 275, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1285), ch. 292, p. 1440, § 3, effective July 13.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1703 as it existed prior to 1994.

43-5-504. Motorcycle operator safety training fund.

The motorcycle operator safety training fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money collected under sections 42-2-114 (2)(d), 42-2-118 (1)(b)(II), and 42-3-304 (4). The money in the fund is available immediately, without further appropriation, for allocation by the chief to the office to be used for the implementation and administration of the program. Money credited to the fund remains in the fund at the end of each fiscal year and is not transferred to any other fund.

The chief, the program coordinator, or a MOST vendor shall not expend or credit moneys for MOST vendor operating expenses or reimburse motorcycles, helmets, textbooks, and other capital expenses incurred by MOST vendors, excluding the travel costs of mobile training.

The chief or his or her designee may accept, on behalf of and in the name of the state, gifts, donations, and grants for any purpose connected with the program. Any property so given shall be held by the state treasurer, but the chief or his or her designee may direct the disposition of any property so given for any purpose consistent with the terms and conditions under which the gift was made.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 2541, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 262, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1185, § 39, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1083), ch. 86, p. 275, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1066), ch. 290, p. 1189, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-243), ch. 256, p. 1072, § 4, effective January 1, 2018.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1704 as it existed prior to 1994.

43-5-505. Advisory board.

The motorcycle operator safety advisory board is hereby created. The board consists of:

The director of the Colorado department of transportation or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of revenue or the executive director's designee;

The chief of the Colorado state patrol or the chief's designee; and

Nine members appointed by the chief of the Colorado state patrol:

Two members who represent MOST vendors;

One member who represents retail motorcycle dealers;

One member who represents third-party testers;

Two members who represent instructor training specialists;

One member who represents the motorcycle riding community;

Repealed.

One member who represents law enforcement agencies; and

One member who represents motorcycle insurance providers.

The board shall meet to:

Recommend training methods to increase safety and reduce motorcycle crashes and injuries;

Recommend training methods to increase program effectiveness;

Recommend improvements to the program and training; and

Make recommendations on expenditures of fund moneys.

Each board member appointed under paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section serves a two-year term; except that, of the board members appointed initially, one-half serve for a one-year term and the remaining members serve a two-year term.

The board shall elect from among the board members listed in paragraphs (a) to (c) of subsection (1) of this section a chair and vice-chair, both of whom serve two-year terms. The chair presides over all board meetings. The vice-chair presides in the absence of the chair.

The board shall develop a vision and mission consistent with the program.

The board shall meet at least quarterly.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 2541, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

Entire section RC&RE, (HB 13-1083), ch. 86, p. 276, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) and IP(1)(d) amended, (SB 17-243), ch. 256, p. 1073, § 5, effective January 1, 2018.

L. 2020:

(1)(d)(IV) amended and (1)(d)(VI) repealed, (HB 20-1285), ch. 292, p. 1440, § 4, effective July 13.

43-5-506. Report.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), no later than September 1 of each year, the department of public safety shall report to the legislative audit committee and the house and senate transportation committees, or their successor committees. The report must comment on the effectiveness of the program, annual motorcycle accidents or fatalities, availability of training throughout the state, historic and current training costs, and other performance measures.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1083), ch. 86, p. 277, § 6, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-243), ch. 256, p. 1073, § 6, effective January 1, 2018.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1137), ch. 84, p. 684, § 3, effective August 8.

Cross references:

(1) For the program referenced in this section, see § 43-5-502.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1137, see section 1 of chapter 84, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

43-5-507. Repeal of part.

This part 5 is repealed, effective September 1, 2025. Before the repeal, this part 5 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1083), ch. 86, p. 277, § 6, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-243), ch. 256, p. 1073, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1285), ch. 292, p. 1439, § 2, effective July 13.